North Dakota, session 69, SB2185.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION - PARKS AND RECREATION - LAKE METIGOSHE
STATE PARK SEWER INFRASTRUCTURE REPLACEMENT GRANT PROJECT - ONE-TIME
FUNDING. There is appropriated out of any moneys in the general fund in the state treasury,
not otherwise appropriated, the sum of $1,000,000, or so much of the sum as may be
necessary, to the parks and recreation department, for the purpose of providing a grant to a
local water resource district to replace the water and sewer infrastructure system servicing Lake
Metigoshe state park and surrounding areas, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and
ending June 30, 2027. This funding is considered a one-time funding item.
Page No. 1 25.0956.01000